Arkansas statutes. Title 1 General Provisions
Chapter 2 The Code and Regulations
1-2-207. Identical acts — Same subject matter.

(a)(1)

When identical acts are enacted by the General Assembly during the same session, the act which the Governor signs last shall be deemed to have repealed the earlier enactment.

(2)

If the Governor does not sign one (1) or both of the acts then the act which was last voted on by either house of the General Assembly shall be deemed to have repealed the other identical enactments.

(b)(1)

When more than one (1) act concerning the same subject matter is enacted by the General Assembly during the same session, whether or not specifically amending the same sections of the Arkansas Code or an uncodified act, all of the enactments shall be given effect except to the extent of irreconcilable conflicts in which case the conflicting provision of the last enactment shall prevail.

(2)

The last enactment is the one which the Governor signs last or if the Governor does not sign one of the acts then the last enactment is the act which was last voted on by either house of the General Assembly.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1167, §§ 1, 2; 1999, No. 403, § 1.

1-2-208. “Fiscal session” and “regular session” defined.

As used in the Arkansas Code, an act of the General Assembly, and an initiated measure:

(1)

“Fiscal session” means with respect to the General Assembly the legislative session in which the General Assembly may consider only appropriation bills under Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 5(c); and

(2)

“Regular session” means with respect to the General Assembly the legislative session in which the General Assembly may consider any bill under Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 5(b).

History.

Acts 2009, No. 962, § 1.

Subchapter 3

— Arkansas Code Revision Commission

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2005, No. 1260, § 1, provided:

“(a)(1)

Effective July 1, 2005, employees of the Arkansas Code Revision Commission are transferred to the Bureau of Legislative Research and shall be employees of the bureau.

“(2)

Effective July 1, 2005, the person who was employed as Executive Director of the Arkansas Code Revision Commission on June 30, 2005, shall become the code revisor for the Bureau of Legislative Research.

“(b)

All of the commission's records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and funds are transferred to the Bureau of Legislative Research.

“(c)

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall retain its powers, duties, and functions with respect to the Arkansas Code but staff support shall be provided by the Bureau of Legislative Research.

“(d)(1)

Employees transferred from the Arkansas Code Revision Commission may occupy positions authorized for the Bureau of Legislative Research and Bureau of Legislative Research employees may occupy positions authorized for the Arkansas Code Revision Commission.

“(2)

Appropriations authorized for the personal services and operating expenses of the Arkansas Code Revision Commission may be utilized for the personal services and operating expenses of the Bureau of Legislative Research and appropriations authorized for the personal services and operating expenses of the Bureau of Legislative Research may be utilized for the personal services and operating expenses of the office and employees transferred from the Arkansas Code Revision Commission and for operating expenses of the Arkansas Code Revision Commission.”

Preambles.

Acts 1955, No. 246 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, the General Assembly by Act No. 50 of 1945 created the Arkansas Statute Revision Commission for the purpose of arranging for a compilation of laws of the State of Arkansas, which compilation was published in Annotated and Unannotated editions known as Arkansas Statutes, 1947, and

“Whereas, biennial supplements have been printed since that time, and it is now imperative that continuous supervision be provided for the editorial preparation and publication of replacement volumes;

“Now therefore … .”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1945, No. 50, § 10: Feb. 14, 1945. Emergency clause provided: “Since there is an immediate and urgent need for revising and digesting the Statutes of Arkansas, which work will require extensive planning, research and preparation, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act, being deemed necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall become effective from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 334, § 4: Mar. 19, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Arkansas Statute Revision Commission, acting under the authority of Act 641 of 1983, entered into a contract on August 1, 1984 with the Michie Company of Charlottesville, Virginia for a codification of the Statutes of the State of Arkansas of a general and permanent nature, and pursuant to such contract, the proposed Arkansas Code of 1987, consisting of 28 titles and 29 printed volumes, has been presented to the General Assembly for enactment by the 76th regular session; that upon enactment of the Code of Arkansas of 1987 by the General Assembly, the name of the Arkansas Statute Revision Commission should be changed to the Arkansas Code Revision Commission, and the duties of said Commission should be enlarged to provide for continuing review, revision, codification, and updating of the Code of 1987, including the incorporation therein of Statutes of a general and permanent nature enacted by the regular session of the 1987 General Assembly, in order that the entire body of the Arkansas Code of 1987 may be effective January 1, 1988; and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to change the name of said Commission to enable the Code Revision Commission to pursue its duties as outlined in this Act without undue delay. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and welfare, shall be in full force and effect upon its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 1009, § 3: Apr. 14, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that because of the case Ricarte v. State, CR 86-31, a question has arisen over the validity of Act 1219 of the Extended Session of 1976; that this Act is a reenactment of the former law; and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to clarify the state of the law on this issue. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governer, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1997, No. 533, § 8: Mar. 17, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that there are presently inadequate statutory guidelines for the codifications of the acts of the General Assembly; that this act establishes necessary guidelines; and that this act should go into effect immediately in order that the guidelines will be in effect for the codification of the acts of this regular session. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 751, § 9: Mar. 22, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that there are presently inadequate statutory guidelines for the codifications of the acts of the General Assembly; this act establishes necessary guidelines; and this act should go into effect immediately in order that the guidelines will be in effect for the codification of the acts of this regular session. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2001, No. 327, § 3: retroactive to Mar. 17, 1997.

Acts 2001, No. 327, § 4: Feb. 21, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly that the present law pertaining to the powers of the Arkansas Code Revision Commission are too restrictive and that with the changes made by this act, the acts of the General Assembly can be more quickly and efficiently codified; that this act should go into effect as soon as possible so that the codification of the acts of this regular session may occur with as little delay as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2001, No. 1308, § 16: July 1, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2001 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2001 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2001.”

Acts 2005, No. 1260, § 4: July 1, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act requires the Bureau of Legislative Research to assist the Arkansas Code Revision Commission and transfers the staff of the commission to the bureau; that to effectively administer this act the transition should occur at the beginning of the next fiscal year; that the effectiveness of this act on July 1, 2005, is essential to the operation of the commission; and that in the event of an extension of the regular session, the delay in the effective date of this act beyond July 1, 2005, could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration of the preparation of the Arkansas Code. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2005.”

Acts 2019, No. 694, § 8: Apr. 4, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that under current law the Arkansas Code Revision Commission does not have the authority to correct conflicts occurring when multiple acts amend the same provision of the Arkansas Constitution as expressly permitted by the Arkansas Constitution; that this inability to resolve conflicts makes the law unclear and impossible to publish for review and study by the citizens of the state; and that this act should become effective at the earliest opportunity so that it may be applied to acts enacted by the Ninety-Second General Assembly. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto”.

1-2-301. Creation — Members.

(a)(1)

There is created within the legislative branch of government a commission to be known as the “Arkansas Code Revision Commission”.

(2)

The commission shall consist of seven (7) voting members and four (4) nonvoting observer members.

(b)(1)

The voting members shall be selected and appointed as follows:

(A)

Two (2) members of the Senate appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate;

(B)

Two (2) members of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; and

(C)

Three (3) members of the Bar of Arkansas appointed by the Supreme Court.

(2)(A)

The nonvoting observer members shall be:

(i)

The Dean of the University of Arkansas at Fayetteville School of Law or, if there is no such dean, the individual occupying the position of acting dean;

(ii)

The Dean of the University of Arkansas at Little Rock William H. Bowen School of Law or, if there is no such dean, the individual occupying the position of acting dean;

(iii)

The Attorney General or his or her designee; and

(iv)

The Director of the Bureau of Legislative Research or his or her designee.

(B)

The nonvoting observer members of the commission shall be privileged to attend all meetings of the commission and shall enjoy the full rights of membership on the commission, including the right to discuss matters pending before the commission and to participate in debate of issues before the commission, but shall not cast a vote on any issue pending before the commission.

(C)

Each member appointed by the Supreme Court shall serve for a term of four (4) years, and each member appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall serve for a term of two (2) years.

(D)

The appointing authorities shall have power to fill any vacancies occurring in the membership appointed by them.

(E)

The commission shall meet and select a chair.

(F)(i)

Nonlegislator members shall, to the extent funds are appropriated therefor, be eligible to receive reimbursement for mileage and reimbursement for expenses in accordance with §25-16-902.

(ii)

Legislator members shall be entitled to reimbursement for expenses and per diem at the same rate and from the same source as provided by law for members of the General Assembly attending meetings of interim committees.

History.

Acts 1945, No. 50, §§ 1, 8; 1977, No. 665, § 1; 1983, No. 641, §§ 1, 3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 1-300, 1-303; Acts 1997, No. 250, § 1; 1997, No. 533, § 1; 1999, No. 751, §§ 1, 2; 2001, No. 327, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2005, No. 1260, § 1, provided:

“(a)(1)

Effective July 1, 2005, employees of the Arkansas Code Revision Commission are transferred to the Bureau of Legislative Research and shall be employees of the bureau.

“(2)

Effective July 1, 2005, the person who was employed as Executive Director of the Arkansas Code Revision Commission on June 30, 2005, shall become the code revisor for the Bureau of Legislative Research.

“(b)

All of the commission's records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and funds are transferred to the Bureau of Legislative Research.

“(c)

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall retain its powers, duties, and functions with respect to the Arkansas Code but staff support shall be provided by the Bureau of Legislative Research.

“(d)(1)

Employees transferred from the Arkansas Code Revision Commission may occupy positions authorized for the Bureau of Legislative Research and Bureau of Legislative Research employees may occupy positions authorized for the Arkansas Code Revision Commission.

“(2)

Appropriations authorized for the personal services and operating expenses of the Arkansas Code Revision Commission may be utilized for the personal services and operating expenses of the Bureau of Legislative Research and appropriations authorized for the personal services and operating expenses of the Bureau of Legislative Research may be utilized for the personal services and operating expenses of the office and employees transferred from the Arkansas Code Revision Commission and for operating expenses of the Arkansas Code Revision Commission.”

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1983, No. 641, § 4, provided that “Nothing in the act would be deemed to terminate the term of any person serving as a member of the Commission at the effective date of its enactment and the terms of existing Commissioners would continue until they expired in accordance with their original appointment.”

Acts 1987, No. 334, § 1, provided that the name of the Arkansas Statute Revision Commission, as established by Acts 1945, No. 50, as amended, is changed to the Arkansas Code Revision Commission, that the latter commission shall succeed to all powers, etc., of the former commission, as now provided by law, that all funds allocated or appropriated to the former commission shall be made available for the support of the new commission and its staff, and that the Arkansas Statute Revision Fund established in the State Treasury under the provisions of Acts 1983, No. 651 shall be known as the Arkansas Code Revision Fund.

1-2-302. Code Revisor and staff assistance.

(a)(1)

The Bureau of Legislative Research shall employ a person to serve as Code Revisor.

(2)(A)

The Director of the Bureau of Legislative Research shall seek the advice of the Arkansas Code Revision Commission before employing a person as Code Revisor and before terminating the employment of a person who is serving as Code Revisor.

(B)

The commission shall be entitled to interview applicants for the position of Code Revisor.

(b)

The director shall consult with the commission concerning the duties, authority, and responsibility of the Code Revisor and concerning the code revision duties of other bureau personnel who assist the commission.

History.

Acts 1945, No. 50, § 1; 1977, No. 665, § 1; 1983, No. 641, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 1-300; Acts 2005, No. 1260, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2005, No. 1260, § 1, provided:

“(a)(1)

Effective July 1, 2005, employees of the Arkansas Code Revision Commission are transferred to the Bureau of Legislative Research and shall be employees of the bureau.

“(2)

Effective July 1, 2005, the person who was employed as Executive Director of the Arkansas Code Revision Commission on June 30, 2005, shall become the code revisor for the Bureau of Legislative Research.

“(b)

All of the commission's records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and funds are transferred to the Bureau of Legislative Research.

“(c)

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall retain its powers, duties, and functions with respect to the Arkansas Code but staff support shall be provided by the Bureau of Legislative Research.

“(d)(1)

Employees transferred from the Arkansas Code Revision Commission may occupy positions authorized for the Bureau of Legislative Research and Bureau of Legislative Research employees may occupy positions authorized for the Arkansas Code Revision Commission.

“(2)

Appropriations authorized for the personal services and operating expenses of the Arkansas Code Revision Commission may be utilized for the personal services and operating expenses of the Bureau of Legislative Research and appropriations authorized for the personal services and operating expenses of the Bureau of Legislative Research may be utilized for the personal services and operating expenses of the office and employees transferred from the Arkansas Code Revision Commission and for operating expenses of the Arkansas Code Revision Commission.”

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment rewrote this section.

1-2-303. Powers and duties — Definition.

(a)(1)

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission from time to time shall arrange for the publication of compilations, recompilations, revisions, codifications, or recodifications of or cumulative or noncumulative supplements to the statutes of Arkansas.

(2)

The commission shall arrange for the solicitation and receipt of competitive bids for all these publications on such terms as it deems reasonable.

(3)

Specifications for the publications shall be drawn under the supervision of and subject to approval by the commission.

(4)(A)

Contracts shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder, taking into consideration, among other things, estimated time of performance, quality of work, probability of timely and adequate performance, and experience of the company regarding the services sought by the commission.

(B)

If the best interests of the state would be served, any and all bids submitted to the commission regarding any publication project may be rejected, and the commission may negotiate any necessary contract with the party most qualified to perform the services sought by the commission.

(5)(A)

The price at which publications under this section shall be sold shall be fixed from time to time by the commission.

(B)

If the commission enters into a contract with a publisher for any publication, the price at which the publication under the contract shall be sold shall be fixed from time to time by agreement between the commission and the publisher.

(6)

Supplements and replacement volumes published under the supervision of the commission shall be prima facie evidence of the law contained in the supplements and replacement volumes.

(b)

In the commission's discretion and subject to the provisions and requirements of §19-4-1109, the commission may enter into contracts for professional services to the commission, which contracts may include, but are not limited to, the purposes of:

(1)(A)

Creating and maintaining up-to-date continuing computerized database banks of the statutes of Arkansas by use of magnetic tape or other means of photographic or electronic preservation and reproduction systems with facilities for electronic access and retrieval.

(B)

However, before the commission shall enter into any contract for computerized database banks of the statutes of Arkansas, the commission shall confer with and seek the advice of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Legislative Council, and the Director of the Bureau of Legislative Research with respect to the needs and requirements for use of computerized database banks of the statutes of Arkansas:

(i)

For electronic access and statutory retrieval in connection with a computerized bill drafting and bill processing system;

(ii)

To meet the needs of the General Assembly and the committees of the General Assembly; and

(iii)

To assist in the preparation of acts signed by the Governor for printing of the official Acts of Arkansas.

(C)

The commission shall confer periodically with the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Legislative Council, and the director and shall seek their advice with respect to means of upgrading and improving the computerized database banks to meet the needs and requirements for their respective uses;

(2)

Providing continuing assistance to the commission in the maintenance of the databases and the appropriate codification of legislation enacted by the General Assembly;

(3)

Performing those other services which are determined by the commission from time to time to be reasonably required and necessary in order to maintain availability to the State of Arkansas of up-to-date computerized database indices of the statutes of Arkansas and in furtherance of its duties and authority as otherwise provided by this subchapter and by other provisions of law; and

(4)

Preparing a codification of all the statutes in a proposed code of laws to be presented to the General Assembly for approval and enactment, or, in lieu of a single codification of all of the state's statutes, preparation of recommended codes of a similar subject or nature in proposed titles or chapters of a code for consideration by the General Assembly for enactment from time to time with the overall objective of eventually incorporating all of the state's statutes in a unified codification of those laws.

(c)

The Code Revisor and other designated personnel of the Bureau of Legislative Research shall assist the commission:

(1)

To make continual studies and conduct reviews of the common law, statutes, and current judicial decisions of the state in order to identify:

(A)

Obsolete statutes;

(B)

Overlapping and duplicating laws;

(C)

Inequitable or inconsistent laws;

(D)

Deficiencies in existing laws which contribute to indefiniteness of interpretation of the purpose of those laws or the legislative intent of those laws;

(E)

Deficiencies in administrative procedures;

(F)

Defects in practice and procedure; and

(G)

Deficiencies of due process provisions in the enforcement of the criminal laws of this state;

(2)

To prepare initial drafts of corrective legislation to be submitted to the commission in advance of each regular session of the General Assembly; and

(3)(A)

To make studies of the methods, means, and systems used in the various states for the compilation, codification, revision, and publication of the compilations, codifications, or statutes of those states.

(B)

These studies are to be used by the commission in determining means of improving the codification of the statutes of Arkansas and to prepare recommendations to the General Assembly in regard to the codification of statutes.

(d)(1)

In exercising the powers and duties imposed upon it by this subchapter, the commission shall not authorize any change in the substance or meaning of any provision of the Arkansas Code or any act of the General Assembly. The bureau shall not change the substance or meaning of any provision of the Arkansas Code or any act of the General Assembly. However, the bureau working under the direction of the commission may:

(A)

Correct the spelling of words;

(B)

Change capitalization for the purpose of uniformity;

(C)

Correct manifest typographical and grammatical errors;

(D)

Correct manifest errors in references to laws and other documents;

(E)

Correct manifest errors in internal reference numbers;

(F)

Substitute the proper Arkansas Code section number, subchapter number, chapter number, subtitle number, title number, or other number or designation for the terms “this act”, “the preceding Code section”, or any similar words or phrases;

(G)

Number, renumber, redesignate, and rearrange chapters, subchapters, sections, subsections, and subdivisions, or any combination or portion of chapters, subchapters, sections, subsections, and subdivisions;

(H)

Change internal reference numbers to agree with renumbered chapters, subchapters, sections, subsections, subdivisions, or portions of chapters, subchapters, sections, subsections, and subdivisions;

(I)

Substitute the correct calendar date for “the effective date of this act” and other phrases of similar import;

(J)

Correct inaccurate references to:

(i)

Funds;

(ii)

Fund accounts;

(iii)

The titles of officers;

(iv)

The names of departments or other agencies of the federal government, the state government, or local governments, and the names of other entities; and

(v)

The short titles of other laws;

(K)

Make any other name changes necessary to be consistent with the laws currently in effect;

(L)

Alphabetize definitions and make any necessary changes to conform the definitions sections to Arkansas Code style and format;

(M)

Insert or delete hyphens in words to follow correct grammatical usage;

(N)

Change numerals or symbols to words or vice versa and add figures or words if they are merely repetitions of written words or vice versa for purposes of uniformity and style;

(O)

Change the form of nouns, pronouns, and verbs for purposes of style and grammar;

(P)

Correct punctuation;

(Q)

Correct word usage;

(R)

Change gender-specific language to gender-neutral language; and

(S)

Remove obsolete language.

(2)

Except as provided in subdivision (d)(1) of this section, the wording, punctuation, and format of sections of acts shall appear in the Arkansas Code exactly as enacted by the General Assembly.

(3)

No law may be removed from the Arkansas Code unless specifically repealed by the General Assembly.

(4)

Every section of each act which is required to be codified shall be codified as a complete section of the Arkansas Code unless otherwise consented to by the director.

(5)

Sections of acts shall not be combined into the same Arkansas Code section unless they are identical or they specifically amend the same Arkansas Code section.

(6)(A)

No section of an act shall be codified in more than one (1) place in the Arkansas Code without the prior approval of the director.

(B)

If a section is applicable to more than one (1) title, chapter, subchapter, or section of the Arkansas Code, it shall be codified only in one (1) section unless otherwise consented to by the director, with notes indicating its applicability to other portions of the Arkansas Code.

(7)

The commission shall notify the Legislative Council no later than the first Friday of each month of the discovery of problems with the acts or the Arkansas Code and recommend corrections.

(8)

The commission shall insert a codifier's note under appropriate Arkansas Code sections to alert the reader to conflicting Arkansas Code provisions and other problems identified by the commission.

(9)(A)(i)

The commission shall provide a copy of its conformed acts to the director within one hundred twenty (120) days after the adjournment of each session of the General Assembly.

(ii)

The conformed acts may be provided in an electronic format.

(B)

As used in subdivision (d)(9)(A) of this section, “conformed acts” means those documents prepared by the commission indicating the differences between the codification of the acts and the original forms of the acts.

(10)

If the acts of the General Assembly are in markup format, language overstricken shall not be codified and underlined language shall not be underlined in the Arkansas Code.

(e)(1)

Except as provided in subdivision (e)(2) of this section, the commission shall codify every initiated measure enacted by the people of Arkansas and every act of each regular and extraordinary session of the General Assembly.

(2)

The commission shall not be required to codify the following language or sections found in initiated measures or acts of the General Assembly:

(A)

Appropriation language;

(B)

Boilerplate language;

(C)

Codification clauses;

(D)

Effective date language;

(E)

Emergency clauses;

(F)

Expiration date language;

(G)

General repealers;

(H)

Intent, purpose, construction, and applicability language;

(I)

Language that specifically refers to an appropriation;

(J)

Sections stating that they are not to be codified;

(K)

Sections that the Legislative Council requests that the commission not codify;

(L)

Local, special, or temporary language; and

(M)

Severability clauses.

(f)(1)

The Code Revisor is expected to notify the director on an act-by-act basis within one (1) business day after discovering that a change should be made which requires the prior approval of the director.

(2)

The director is expected to respond to the Code Revisor within one (1) business day after receiving notice from the commission.

(g)(1)

All uncodified local acts, special acts, and temporary acts, excluding appropriation acts, shall be cumulatively indexed by the commission using descriptive wording and shall include references to the act numbers and years of enactment.

(2)

No later than one hundred twenty (120) days after the adjournment of each legislative session, the Code Revisor shall provide a report to the director and the Legislative Council identifying which acts and parts of acts of the session are to be cumulatively indexed pursuant to subdivision (g)(1) of this section.

(h)

The director may delegate his or her authority under this section to another employee of the bureau.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 246, §§ 1, 2; 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1219, § 1; 1977, No. 665, § 2; 1983, No. 641, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 1-301, 1-302; Acts 1987, No. 334, § 2; reen. 1987, No. 1009, § 1; Acts 1995, No. 459, § 1; 1997, No. 533, § 2; 1999, No. 751, §§ 3, 4; 2001, No. 327, § 2; 2005, No. 1260, § 3; 2007, No. 436, § 1; 2017, No. 598, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Part of this section was reenacted by Acts 1987, No. 1009, § 1. Acts 1987, No. 834, provided that 1987 legislation reenacting acts passed in the 1976 Extended Session should not repeal any other 1987 legislation and that such other legislation would be controlling in the event of conflict.

Acts 2005, No. 1260, § 1, provided:

“(a)(1)

Effective July 1, 2005, employees of the Arkansas Code Revision Commission are transferred to the Bureau of Legislative Research and shall be employees of the bureau.

“(2)

Effective July 1, 2005, the person who was employed as Executive Director of the Arkansas Code Revision Commission on June 30, 2005, shall become the code revisor for the Bureau of Legislative Research.

“(b)

All of the commission's records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and funds are transferred to the Bureau of Legislative Research.

“(c)

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall retain its powers, duties, and functions with respect to the Arkansas Code but staff support shall be provided by the Bureau of Legislative Research.

“(d)(1)

Employees transferred from the Arkansas Code Revision Commission may occupy positions authorized for the Bureau of Legislative Research and Bureau of Legislative Research employees may occupy positions authorized for the Arkansas Code Revision Commission.

“(2)

Appropriations authorized for the personal services and operating expenses of the Arkansas Code Revision Commission may be utilized for the personal services and operating expenses of the Bureau of Legislative Research and appropriations authorized for the personal services and operating expenses of the Bureau of Legislative Research may be utilized for the personal services and operating expenses of the office and employees transferred from the Arkansas Code Revision Commission and for operating expenses of the Arkansas Code Revision Commission.”

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment substituted “The code … commission” for “The commission shall cause the executive director and other staff members of the commission” in (c); in (d)(1), inserted the second sentence and inserted “the bureau working under the direction of” in the last sentence; substituted “director” for “Bureau of Legislative Research” in (d)(9)(A)(i); substituted “Code Revisor” for “commission” in (f)(1), (f)(2) and (g)(2); and inserted “and the Legislative Council” in (g)(2).

The 2007 amendment substituted “April 1 of the next calendar year following” for “one hundred twenty (120) days after” in (c)(2).

The 2017 amendment substituted “submitted to the commission in advance of each regular session of the General Assembly” for “filed with the Legislative Council no later than April 1 of the next calendar year following the adjournment of each session” in (c)(2).

1-2-304. Commission not to incur obligations absent appropriated or available funds.

(a)

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall not enter into any contracts or incur any financial obligations with publishing firms for the compilation, recompilation, revision, codification, or recodification of the statutes of Arkansas, nor shall the commission enter into contracts for professional services or incur any obligation of a continuing nature as authorized in this subchapter if the expenditure of state funds will be required, unless funds have been appropriated or are available from other sources available to it for that purpose.

(b)

In no event shall the commission create a financial commitment or obligation, to be paid by the commission or the State of Arkansas, in excess of the funds available to the commission for the fiscal year in which the services or obligations are incurred.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 641, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 1-303; Acts 1987, No. 334, § 3; 2015, No. 1154, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment substituted “fiscal year” for “biennial period” in (b).

1-2-305. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning the Arkansas Code Revision Fund, was repealed by Acts 2001, No. 1308, § 6. The section was derived from Acts 1983, No. 651, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 1-304.

1-2-306. [Repealed.]

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Pursuant to §1-2-207, the repeal of this section by Acts 1995, No. 1256, supersedes its amendment by Acts 1995, No. 232. Subsection (c) of this section was amended by Acts 1995, No. 232, § 1, to read as follows:

“(c)

All funds collected pursuant to the additional costs levied in this section shall be remitted monthly by the collecting officer to the county treasurer and shall be credited to a fund designated as the Arkansas Code Revision fund. On or before the tenth of each month, the county treasurer shall remit all such funds to the Arkansas Code Revision Commission. The moneys received by the Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall be deposited in the State Treasury as special revenues and credited to the Arkansas Code Revision Fund.”

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning additional court fees, was repealed by Acts 1995, No. 1256, § 20, as amended by Acts 1995 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 13, § 4. The section was derived from Acts 1983, No. 651, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 1-305; Acts 1987, No. 140, § 1; 1991, No. 904, §§ 1, 20; 1995, No. 232, § 1.

1-2-307. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning a code of state regulations, was repealed by Acts 1997, No. 533, § 3. The section was derived from Acts 1995, No. 459, § 2.